hr-HR: Cilj treninga hokeja na travi: Kontrola lopte; Dribling; Agilnost rada nogu; Reakcija vratara; Poboljšanje prianjanja; Više vještina; Točnost dodavanja; Točnost šuta; Trening brzine; Snaga i kondicija; Ostalo
fr: Objectif d’entraînement au hockey sur gazon: Contrôle de la balle; Dribble; Agilité du jeu de jambes; Réaction du gardien de but; Amélioration de la prise en main; Polyvalent; Précision des passes; Précision des tirs; Entraînement de vitesse; Renforcement et conditionnement; Autre
hu: Gyeplabda edzés célja: Labdakezelés; Cselezés; Lábmunka és agilitás; Kapusreakció; Tapadásnövelés; Több készséget fejlesztő; Passzolási pontosság; Lövési pontosság; Sebességnövelő edzés; Erőnlét és kondicionálás; Egyéb
ru: Цель тренировки по хоккею на траве: Контроль мяча; Дриблинг; Подвижность и работа ног; Реакция вратаря; Улучшение хвата; Комплексные навыки; Точность передач; Точность бросков; Тренировка скорости; Общая физическая подготовка; Другое
lt-LT: Žolės riedulio treniruočių tikslas: Kamuoliuko valdymas; Varymasis; Kojų miklumas; Vartininko reakcija; Sukibimo gerinimas; Kelių įgūdžių; Perdavimo tikslumas; Smūgiavimo tikslumas; Greičio treniruotė; Jėga ir fizinis pasirengimas; Kita
de: Trainingsziel im Feldhockey: Ballkontrolle; Dribbling; Beinarbeit-Agilität; Torwartreaktion; Griffverbesserung; Multi-Skill; Passgenauigkeit; Schussgenauigkeit; Schnelligkeitstraining; Kraft und Kondition; Sonstige
nl: Veldhockey trainingsdoel: Balcontrole; Dribbelen; Voetenwerk-behendigheid; Reactievermogen keeper; Gripverbetering; Multi-skill; Passing-nauwkeurigheid; Schietnauwkeurigheid; Snelheidstraining; Kracht en conditie; Overig
ro-RO: Obiectiv de antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă: Controlul mingii; Dribling; Agilitatea jocului de picioare; Reacția portarului; Îmbunătățirea prizei; Abilități multiple; Precizia paselor; Precizia șuturilor; Antrenament de viteză; Forță și condiție fizică; Altele
th: วัตถุประสงค์การฝึกซ้อมฮอกกี้สนาม: การควบคุมลูก; การเลี้ยงลูก; ความคล่องตัวของการใช้เท้า; ปฏิกิริยาของผู้รักษาประตู; การเพิ่มความกระชับในการจับ; ทักษะที่หลากหลาย; ความแม่นยำในการส่งลูก; ความแม่นยำในการยิงประตู; การฝึกความเร็ว; ความแข็งแกร่งและการปรับสภาพร่างกาย; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Objetivo do treino de hóquei em campo: Controle de bola; Drible; Agilidade no jogo de pernas; Reação do goleiro; Melhoria de aderência; Multihabilidade; Precisão de passe; Precisão de chute; Treino de velocidade; Força e condicionamento; Outro
it: Obiettivo dell'allenamento di hockey su prato: Controllo della palla; Dribbling; Agilità nei movimenti dei piedi; Reazione del portiere; Miglioramento della presa; Multiskill; Precisione nei passaggi; Precisione nei tiri; Allenamento per la velocità; Forza e condizionamento; Altro
pl: Cel treningu hokeja na trawie: Kontrola nad piłką; Drybling; Praca stóp i zwinność; Reakcja bramkarza; Poprawa chwytu; Wiele umiejętności; Celność podań; Celność strzałów; Trening szybkościowy; Siła i kondycja; Inne
tr: Çim hokeyi antrenman amacı: Top kontrolü; Top sürme; Ayak hareketi çevikliği; Kaleci reaksiyonu; Kavrama geliştirme; Çoklu beceri; Pas isabeti; Şut isabeti; Hız antrenmanı; Güç ve kondisyon; Diğer
da: Mål for hockeytræning: Boldkontrol; Dribling; Fodarbejde og smidighed; Målmandsreaktion; Forbedret greb; Flere færdigheder; Afleveringspræcision; Skudpræcision; Farttræning; Styrke og kondition; Andet
sk-SK: Cieľ tréningu pozemného hokeja: Kontrola lopty; Driblovanie; Pohyblivosť nôh; Reakcia brankára; Zlepšenie úchopu; Viacero zručností; Presnosť prihrávok; Presnosť streľby; Tréning rýchlosti; Sila a kondícia; Iné
cs: Cíl tréninku pozemního hokeje: Kontrola míče; Driblink; Práce nohou a obratnost; Reakce brankáře; Zlepšení úchopu; Více dovedností; Přesnost přihrávek; Přesnost střelby; Rychlostní trénink; Silový a kondiční trénink; Jiné
bg-BG: Цел на тренировката по хокей на трева: Контрол над топката; Дрибъл; Пъргавина на краката; Реакция на вратаря; Подобряване на захвата; Мулти-умения; Точност на подаване; Точност на стрелба; Тренировка за скорост; Сила и кондиция; Други
ko: 필드하키 훈련 목표: 볼 컨트롤; 드리블; 풋워크 민첩성; 골키퍼 반응; 그립 강화; 다기능; 패스 정확도; 슈팅 정확도; 스피드 훈련; 근력 및 컨디셔닝; 기타
nb: Mål for trening i landhockey: Ballkontroll; Dribling; Fotarbeid og smidighet; Målvaktsreaksjon; Grepsforbedring; Flerferdighet; Pasningspresisjon; Skuddpresisjon; Hurtighetstrening; Styrke og kondisjon; Annet
pt-PT: Objectivo do treino de hóquei em campo: Controlo da bola; Drible; Agilidade dos pés; Reação do guarda-redes; Melhoria da aderência; Multicompetência; Precisão de passe; Precisão de remate; Treino de velocidade; Força e condicionamento; Outro
zh-TW: 曲棍球訓練目標: 控球; 運球; 步法靈活性; 守門員反應; 握力增強; 多項技能; 傳球準確度; 射門準確度; 速度訓練; 體能與肌力訓練; 其他
ja: フィールドホッケーのトレーニング目標: ボールコントロール; ドリブル; フットワーク・敏捷性; ゴールキーパーの反応; グリップ力向上; マルチスキル; パスの正確性; シュートの正確性; スピードトレーニング; ストレングス&コンディショニング; その他
sv: Mål för landhockeyträning: Bollkontroll; Dribbling; Fotarbete och smidighet; Målvaktsreaktion; Greppförbättring; Mångsidighet; Passningsprecision; Skottprecision; Snabbhetsträning; Styrka och kondition; Övrigt
el: Στόχος προπόνησης χόκεϊ επί χόρτου: Έλεγχος μπάλας; Ντρίμπλα; Ευκινησία ποδιών; Αντίδραση τερματοφύλακα; Βελτίωση λαβής; Πολλαπλών δεξιοτήτων; Ακρίβεια πάσας; Ακρίβεια σουτ; Προπόνηση ταχύτητας; Ενδυνάμωση και φυσική κατάσταση; Άλλο
fi: Maahockeyn harjoitustavoite: Pallonhallinta; Kuljetus; Jalkatyön ketteryys; Maalivahdin reaktio; Otepidon parantaminen; Monitaito; Syöttötarkkuus; Laukaisutarkkuus; Nopeusharjoittelu; Voima- ja kuntoharjoittelu; Muu
sl-SI: Cilj treninga hokeja na travi: Nadzor žoge; Preigravanje; Agilnost nog; Reakcija vratarja; Izboljšanje oprijema; Več veščin; Natančnost podajanja; Natančnost strela; Trening hitrosti; Moč in kondicija; Drugo
zh-CN: 曲棍球训练目标: 控球; 运球; 步法敏捷性; 守门员反应; 握力增强; 综合技能; 传球准确性; 射门准确性; 速度训练; 体能训练; 其他
en: Field hockey training objective: Ball control; Dribbling; Footwork agility; Goalkeeper reaction; Grip enhancement; Multi-skill; Passing accuracy; Shooting accuracy; Speed training; Strength and conditioning; Other
es: Objetivo de entrenamiento de hockey sobre césped: Control del balón; Regate; Agilidad del juego de pies; Reacción del portero; Mejora de agarre; Multihabilidad; Precisión de pase; Precisión de tiro; Entrenamiento de velocidad; Fuerza y acondicionamiento; Otro
vi: Mục tiêu huấn luyện khúc côn cầu: Kiểm soát bóng; Rê bóng; Sự nhanh nhẹn của đôi chân; Phản xạ của thủ môn; Tăng cường độ bám; Đa kỹ năng; Độ chính xác khi chuyền bóng; Độ chính xác khi sút bóng; Luyện tốc độ; Thể lực và điều hòa; Khác